Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-15] Arbitration process. (a)
An arbitrator may conduct an arbitration in such manner as the arbitrator
considers appropriate for a fair and expeditious disposition of the
proceeding. The authority conferred upon the arbitrator includes the power to
hold conferences with the parties to the arbitration proceeding before the
hearing and, among other matters, determine the admissibility, relevance,
materiality, and weight of any evidence.

(b) An arbitrator may decide a request for
summary disposition of a claim or particular issue:

(1) If all interested parties agree; or

(2) Upon request of one party to the arbitration
proceeding if that party gives notice to all other parties to the proceeding,
and the other parties have a reasonable opportunity to respond.

(c) If an arbitrator orders a hearing, the
arbitrator shall set a time and place and give notice of the hearing not less
than five days before the hearing begins. Unless a party to the arbitration
proceeding makes an objection to lack or insufficiency of notice not later than
the beginning of the hearing, the party's appearance at the hearing waives the
objection. Upon request of a party to the arbitration proceeding and for good
cause shown, or upon the arbitrator's own initiative, the arbitrator may
adjourn the hearing from time to time as necessary but shall not postpone the
hearing to a time later than that fixed by the agreement to arbitrate for
making the award unless the parties to the arbitration proceeding consent to a
later date. The arbitrator may hear and decide the controversy upon the
evidence produced although a party who was duly notified of the arbitration
proceeding did not appear. The court, on request, may direct the arbitrator to
conduct the hearing promptly and render a timely decision.

(d) At a hearing under subsection (c), a party
to the arbitration proceeding has a right to be heard, to present evidence
material to the controversy, and to cross-examine witnesses appearing at the
hearing.

(e) If an arbitrator ceases or is unable to
act during the arbitration proceeding, a replacement arbitrator shall be
appointed in accordance with section 658A-11 to continue the proceeding and to
resolve the controversy. [L 2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next